Utah statutes.
70D-2-504.   Orders.
(1)  If the commissioner determines that a person engaging in business as a
lender, broker, or servicer is violating, has violated, or the commissioner
has reasonable cause to believe is about to violate this chapter or a rule of
the commissioner made under this chapter, the commissioner may:
(a)  order the person to cease and desist from committing a further violation;
and
(b)  in the most serious instances may prohibit the person from continuing to
engage in business as a lender, broker, or servicer.
(2) (a)  If the commissioner determines that a practice that the commissioner
alleges is unlawful should be enjoined during the pendency of a proceeding
incident to an allegation, the commissioner may issue a temporary order in
accordance with Section 63G-4-502:
(i)  at the commencement of the proceedings; or
(ii)  at any time after the proceeding commences.
(b)  For purposes of Section 63G-4-502, an immediate and significant danger to
the public health, safety, or welfare exists if the commissioner finds from
specific facts supported by sworn statement or the records of a person subject
to the order that loan applicants or mortgagors are otherwise likely to suffer
immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage before a proceeding incident
to a final order can be completed.
(3)  The commissioner may not award damages or penalties under this chapter
against a lender, broker, or servicer.
(4) (a)  An order issued by the commissioner under this chapter shall:
(i)  be in writing;
(ii)  be delivered to or served upon the person affected; and
(iii)  specify the order's effective date, which may be immediate or at a
later date.
(b)  An order remains in effect until:
(i)  withdrawn by the commissioner; or
(ii)  terminated by a court order.
(c)  An order of the commissioner, upon application made on or after the
order's effective date to the Third District Court, or in any other district
court, may be enforced ex parte and without notice by an order to comply
entered by the court.
